Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.010

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the uniform adult guardianship and protective proceedings jurisdiction act.

[ 2009 c 81 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: "This act takes effect January 1, 2010." [ 2009 c 81 s 24.]